trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>gían</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>gías</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jamos</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jamos</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jan</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jan</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jas</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jo</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jáis</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jámo</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jámos</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="acó/ger__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ge</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cánta" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>jan</l>
        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="acoger"><p><l>acó</l><r>aco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="coger"><p><l>có</l><r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="escoger"><p><l>escó</l><r>esco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="proteger"><p><l>proté</l><r>prote</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="recoger"><p><l>recó</l><r>reco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="coger al toro por los cuernos" a="webform"><p><l>có</l><r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>al<b/>toro<b/>por<b/>los<b/>cuernos</l><r><g><b/>al<b/>toro<b/>por<b/>los<b/>cuernos</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="proteger" a="eleka"><p><l>proté</l><r>prote</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="emerger" a="eleka"><p><l>emér</l><r>emer</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
